ckb/dictionaries/ckb.aff
SFX N Y 913
SFX N 0 م .
SFX N 0 ت .
SFX N 0 ی .
SFX N 0 مان .
SFX N 0 تان .
SFX N 0 یان .
SFX N 0 ەکە [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کە [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکە [ێی]
SFX N 0 ێک [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێ [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەک [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کان [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکان [یێ]
SFX N 0 ان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەم [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەت [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەی [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەمان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کەم [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەت [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەی [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەمان [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتان [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیان [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکەم [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەت [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەی [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەمان [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەتان [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیان [ێی]
SFX N 0 ێکم [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکت [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکی [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکمان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکتان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکم [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکت [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکی [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکمان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکتان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانم [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانت [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانی [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانمان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانتان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کانم [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانت [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانمان [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانتان [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیان [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکانم [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانت [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانی [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانمان [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانتان [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیان [یێ]
SFX N 0 انم [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انت [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انی [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انمان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انتان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانم [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانت [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانی [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانمان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانتان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 دا .
SFX N 0 مدا .
SFX N 0 تدا .
SFX N 0 یدا .
SFX N 0 ماندا .
SFX N 0 تاندا .
SFX N 0 یاندا .
SFX N 0 ەکەمدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەماندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کەمدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەماندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتاندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیاندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکەمدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەتدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەماندا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەتاندا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیاندا [ێی]
SFX N 0 ێکدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکمدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکتدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکماندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکتاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکمدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکتدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکماندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکتاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانمدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانتدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانماندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانتاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کانمدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانتدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانماندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانتاندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیاندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکانمدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانتدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانماندا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانتاندا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیاندا [یێ]
SFX N 0 انمدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انتدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انماندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انتاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانمدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانتدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانماندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانتاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ڕا .
SFX N 0 مڕا .
SFX N 0 تڕا .
SFX N 0 یڕا .
SFX N 0 مانڕا .
SFX N 0 تانڕا .
SFX N 0 یانڕا .
SFX N 0 ەکەمڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەمانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کەمڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەمانڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتانڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیانڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکەمڕا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەتڕا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیڕا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەمانڕا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەتانڕا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیانڕا [ێی]
SFX N 0 ێکمڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکتڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکمانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکتانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکمڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکتڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکمانڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکتانڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیانڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانمڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانتڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانمانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانتانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کانمڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانتڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانمانڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانتانڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیانڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکانمڕا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانتڕا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیڕا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانمانڕا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانتانڕا [یێ]
SFX N 0 انمڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انتڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انمانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انتانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانمڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانتڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانمانڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانتانڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیانڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یم . 
SFX N 0 یت . 
SFX N 0 ی . 
SFX N 0 یمان . 
SFX N 0 یتان . 
SFX N 0 ییان . 
SFX N 0 گەل .
SFX N 0 ها .
SFX N 0 ین . 
SFX N 0 ن . 
SFX N 0 یشم [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشت [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشی [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشمان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشتان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشیان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشەکە [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 شم [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شت [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شی [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شمان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شتان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شیان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شەکە [ایێە]
SFX N 0 کەش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکەش [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیش [ێی]
SFX N 0 ێکیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کانیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکانیش [یێ]
SFX N 0 انیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەمیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشم [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشت [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشی [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەمانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشمان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشتان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشیان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کەمیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشم [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشت [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەمانیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشمان [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتانیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشتان [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیانیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشیان [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکەمیش [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەشم [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەتیش [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەشت [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیش [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەمانیش [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیشمان [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەشمان [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەتانیش [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەشتان [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیشتان [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیانیش [ێی]
SFX N 0 ێکمیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشم [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکتیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشت [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکییش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشی [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکمانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشمان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکتانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشتان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشیان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکمیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکشم [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکتیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیشت [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکمانیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکئشمان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکتانیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیشتان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیانیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیشیان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانمیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشم [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانتیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشت [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشمان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانمانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشتان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانتانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشیان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کانمیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشم [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانتیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشت [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانمانیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشمان [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانتانیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشتان [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیانیش [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشیان [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکانمیش [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشم [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانتیش [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشت [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانمانیش [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشمان [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانتانیش [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشتان [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیانیش [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشیان [یێ]
SFX N 0 انمیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشم [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انتیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشت [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انییش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشی [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انمانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشمان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انتانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشتان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشیان [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیانیش [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانمیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشم [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشت [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانتیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشی [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانمانیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشتان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانتانیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشیان [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیانیش [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 شدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشمدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشتدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشیدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشماندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشتاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشیاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشەکەدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 شمدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شتدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شیدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شماندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شتاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شیاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شەکەدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 کەشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکەشدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 ێکیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێش [^ایێەدا]
SFX N 0 یەکیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کانیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 انیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەمیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشمدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشتدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشیدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەمانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشماندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشتاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشیاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کەمیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشمدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشتدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەمانیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشماندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتانیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشتاندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیانیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشیاندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکەمیشدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەشمدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەتیشدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەشتدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیشدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەمانیشدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیشماندا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەشماندا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەتانیشدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەشتاندا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیشتاندا [ێی]
SFX N 0 یەکەیانیشدا [ێی]
SFX N 0 ێکمیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشمدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکتیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشتدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکییشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشیدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکمانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشماندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکتانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشتاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێکیشیاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکمیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکشمدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکتیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیشتدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکمانیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکئشماندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکتانیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیشتاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیانیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یەکیشیاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانمیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشمدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانتیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشتدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشماندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانمانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشتاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانتانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشیاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کانمیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشمدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانتیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشتدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانمانیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشماندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانتانیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشتاندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیانیشدا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کانیشیاندا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکانمیشدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشمدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانتیشدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشتدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانمانیشدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشماندا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانتانیشدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشتاندا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیانیشدا [یێ]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشیاندا [یێ]
SFX N 0 انمیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشمدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انتیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشتدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انییشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشیدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انمانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشماندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انتانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشتاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیشیاندا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 انیانیشدا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانمیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشمدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشتدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانتیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشیدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانمانیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشتاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانتانیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشیاندا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیانیشدا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 شڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشمڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشتڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشیڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشمانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشتانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشیانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یشەکەڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 شمڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شتڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شیڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شمانڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شتانڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شیانڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 شەکەڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 کەشڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکەشڕا [ێی]
SFX N 0 ێکیشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ێش [^ایێەڕا]
SFX N 0 یەکیشڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکانیشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کانیشڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکانیشڕا [یێ]
SFX N 0 انیشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 یانیشڕا [ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەمیشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشمڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتیشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشتڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشیڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەمانیشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشمانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەتانیشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشتانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەیانیشڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 ەکەشیانڕا [^ایێە]
SFX N 0 کەمیشڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشمڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتیشڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشتڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیشڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەمانیشڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشمانڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەتانیشڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشتانڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەیانیشڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 کەشیانڕا [ەا]
SFX N 0 یەکەمیشڕا [ێی]
